Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.06
Biological parent; notice of nonconsent; filing; failure to sign; effect.

A biological parent may at any time file a notice of nonconsent with the department stating that at no time prior to his or her death may any information on the adopted person's original birth certificate or any other identifying information, except medical histories as provided in section 43-107, be released to such adopted person. Failure by a biological parent to sign the notice of nonconsent shall be deemed a notice of consent by such parent to release the adopted person's original birth certificate to such adopted person.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 47;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 95.